Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 6

Conflict Resolution

33-2-601. Rules for conflict resolution procedures.

The department shall adopt rules for conflict resolution procedures to assure quick resolution, minimize disruption of service and support to service recipients, and minimize the cost of conflicts in providing services and supports.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-2-602. Licensees to adopt conflict resolution procedures and appeal processes.

Every licensee under this title shall have a clear conflict resolution procedure, including an appeal process, that complies with the department's rules and shall communicate the procedure to each service recipient and family involved in the service. Termination of service or support because a third party payer refuses to continue to fund the service or support is not subject to the conflict resolution procedure. The location where service or support is to be provided is not subject to the conflict resolution procedure unless the location is inaccessible to the service recipient and the service recipient's family, as appropriate. The procedure must include the means to resolve a conflict informally and expeditiously in conformity with the department's rules. A licensee may not cease to provide services and supports to a service recipient with a developmental disability during the pendency of the conflict resolution over the objection of the service recipient.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 5; 2004, ch. 565, § 10.

33-2-603. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-603 (Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1), concerning conflict resolution procedure to include meetings of affected persons, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 6, effective July 1, 2002.

33-2-604. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-604 (Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1), concerning service status not to change during conflict resolution period, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 6, effective July 1, 2002.

33-2-605. Applicability to grievances pertaining to family support program.

This part does not apply to grievances that are to be resolved under § 33-5-209(b)(3) policies and procedures.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.